Massachusetts, session 194th, S1457.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 114 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:-
Section 52. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a town, city,
cemetery corporation or other entity legally responsible for the maintenance or operation of a
cemetery or burial place may allow co-interment of both human and animal remains including
cremated remains. Such entity may issue their own policies on fees, interments, and other
requirements.
of 1